test/src/morphology/adj-t_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that end on -t. From lexicon LÅSSÅt, SUOHKAT, VUOHTA, LEXATTR

Tests:
  Adjective - låssåt: # LÅSSÅT
    låssåt+A+Attr: [låsså, låssis] 
    låssåt+A+Sg+Nom: låssåt
    låssåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [låsep,låssådabbo]
    låssåt+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [låsemus,låssådamos]
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [låsebut, låssådappot]
    låssåt+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [låsemusát, låssådabmusit]
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [låsebusj, låssådappusj]
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [låsebuttjat, låssådapputjit]
    låssåt+A+Der/at+Adv: låssådit
    låssåt+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [låssåvuohta, låssisvuohta]

  Adjective - njárbbat: # SUOHKAT
    njárbbat+A+Attr: njárbbis
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbat
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njárbbadabbo
    njárbbat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njárbbadamos
    njárbbat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: njárbbisvuohta
    njárbbat+A+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: njárbbatvuohta
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: njárbbadappot
    njárbbat+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: njárbbadabmusit
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: njárbbadappusj
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: njárbbadapputjit
    njárbbat+A+Der/at+Adv: njárbbadit
    njárbbat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: njárbbisvuohta

  Adjective - suohkat: # SUOHKAT
    suohkat+A+Attr: suohkkis 
    suohkat+A+Sg+Nom: suohkat 

  Adjective - duolbbat: # SUOHKAT and LEXATTR
    duolbbat+A+Attr: [duolbbis, duolbba]
    duolbbat+A+Sg+Nom: duolbbat 
    duolbbat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: duolbbadabbo
    duolbbat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: duolbbadamos

  Adjective - jalggat: # SUOHKAT, LEXATTR
    jalggat+A+Attr: [jalgga, jalggis]
    jalggat+A+Sg+Nom: jalggat 
    jalggat+A+Sg+Com: jalggadijn 
    jalggat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jalggadabbo
    jalggat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jalggadamos
    jalggat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [jalggavuohta, jalggisvuohta]
    jalggat+A+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: jalggatvuohta

  Adjective - ruoppsat: #  SUOHKAT
    ruoppsat+A+Attr: ruoppsis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Nom: ruoppsat
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Gen: ruoppsada
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Acc: ruoppsadav
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ill: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ine: ruoppsadin
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ela: ruoppsadis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Com: ruoppsadijn
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Nom: ruoppsada
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Gen: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Acc: ruoppsadijt
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ill: ruoppsadijda
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ine: ruoppsadijn
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ela: ruoppsadijs
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Com: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Ess: ruoppsadin
    ruoppsat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ruoppsadabbo
    ruoppsat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ruoppsadamos
